Utah statutes.
53A-24-401.   Definitions.
(1)  "Deaf" means an individual with a diagnosed auditory deficit that renders
the individual unable to comprehend spoken language through audition only,
even with medical intervention or amplification, and results in functional
limitations in one or more areas of daily living.
(2)  "Hearing impairment" means a diagnosed auditory deficit ranging from mild
to profound that may or may not respond to medical intervention or
amplification, and that results in functional limitations in one or more areas
of daily living.
